Washington statutes.
RCW 38.52.545

Priorities for 911 funding.

In specifying rules defining the purposes for which available state 911 moneys may be expended, the state 911 coordinator, with the advice and assistance of the 911 advisory committee, must consider needs necessary to provide a baseline level of 911 service by individual counties and their designated Washington state patrol public safety answering points. Priorities for available 911 emergency communications system funding are as follows:

(1) To procure, fund, and manage the statewide 911 network and supporting services, and assure that 911 dialing is operational statewide;

(2) To assist counties and Washington state patrol public safety answering points to provide 911 emergency communications systems and associated administrative and operational costs as necessary to assure that they can achieve a baseline level of service for 911 operations; and

(3) To assist counties and their designated Washington state patrol public safety answering points to acquire 911 hardware, software, and technology to support a 911 emergency communications system baseline level of service.

[ 2022 c 203 s 15; 2010 1st sp.s. c 19 s 19; 2001 c 128 s 3.]

NOTES:

Modernization of statewide 911 emergency communications system—2022 c 203: See note following RCW 38.52.010.

Effective dates—2010 1st sp.s. c 19: See note following RCW 82.14B.010.

Findings—Effective date—2001 c 128: See notes following RCW 38.52.540.